Hawaii statutes.
§149A-4 Effect of chapter on department of
health. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to amend or alter the
functions, duties, and powers of the department of health relative to chapters
321, 322, 328, and 330. [L 1972, c 58, pt of §1; am L 1975, c 126, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next